North Carolina, session 2025, HB848.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 16 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new Part to read:
"Part 3B. Cultivation of Excellence Pilot Program.
"§ 115C-235. Cultivation of Excellence Pilot Program.
(a) The General Assembly finds that the purpose of the Cultivation of Excellence Pilot
Program is to provide the opportunity for the Cleveland County Board of Education to design
and create an innovative and strategic vision to improve student achievement and performance,
along with teacher recruitment and retention. Cleveland County Schools may participate in the
Cultivation of Excellence Pilot Program beginning with the 2025-2026 school year and ending
following the 2030-2031 school year.
(b) Cleveland County Schools and the Cleveland County Board of Education may do the
following:
(1) Notwithstanding G.S. 115C-301(c), exercise flexibility in establishing
staffing levels for kindergarten through third grade classes.
(2) Notwithstanding G.S. 115C-295, employ individuals as teachers who do not
hold a teacher license, subject to the following limitations:
a. All teachers who are teaching in the core subject areas of mathematics,
science, social studies, and language arts shall be college graduates.
b. No more than fifty percent (50%) of the teachers at any school may be
unlicensed.
c. No more than twenty-five percent (25%) of all teachers employed by
the Cleveland County Board of Education may be unlicensed.
d. All individuals employed as teachers who do not hold a teaching
license shall complete preservice training, which may be offered
through an educator preparation program or through Cleveland County
Schools, in all of the following areas prior to beginning instruction:
1. The identification and education of children with disabilities.
2. Positive management of student behavior.
3. Effective communication for defusing and de-escalating
disruptive or dangerous behavior.
4. Safe and appropriate use of seclusion and restraint.
*H848-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) Notwithstanding G.S. 110-85, G.S. 110-88, and any rule adopted pursuant to
those statutes, employ any individual who meets the requirements for
employment as a teaching assistant in a kindergarten classroom as a teacher
assistant in the local school administrative unit's NC Prekindergarten (NC
Pre-K) program.
(4) Notwithstanding G.S. 115C-105.25(b)(3a) and (12), transfer and approve
transfers of funds for the teacher assistants allotment category and textbooks
and digital resources allotment category.
(c) If the State Board determines that Cleveland County Schools has failed to meet
generally accepted standards of fiscal management or violated State or federal law at any time,
the State Board shall terminate participation in the pilot and shall submit, within 30 days of the
termination, a report of the basis and evidence for the termination to the Joint Legislative
Education Oversight Committee.
(d) The Cleveland County Board of Education shall report no later than December 15 of
each year of the Pilot Program to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee and the
Superintendent of Public Instruction. The report shall include the following:
(1) Employment information as follows:
a. The number of licensed and unlicensed teachers and use of long-term
substitutes in filling vacancies for classroom teachers.
b. Recruiting data on the number of licensed and unlicensed teachers
hired during the school year.
c. The number of NC Pre-K teaching assistants hired who meet the
requirements for employment as a kindergarten teaching assistant.
d. Overall employee retention in each school year.
(2) Average class sizes in grades kindergarten through third grade.
(3) An explanation of how flexibility in allotment categories was used.
(4) An explanation as to how the flexibility granted by this section has contributed
to student success over time, beginning with the 2024-2025 school year for
comparison.
(5) Any additional recommendations for the Cultivation of Excellence Pilot
Program, including additional flexibilities that may contribute to student
success."
SECTION 2. Cleveland County Schools may submit a report to the Joint Legislative
Education Oversight Committee and the Superintendent of Public Instruction by December 15,
2026, on initial implementation of the Cultivation of Excellence Pilot Program and any
recommended legislative changes.
SECTION 3. It is the intent of the General Assembly to provide funding to Cleveland
County Schools to implement a teacher compensation model and student behavior intervention
programs for elementary and middle schools.
SECTION 4. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies beginning with
the 2025-2026 school year. Part 3B of Article 16 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes, as
enacted by this act, is repealed effective December 31, 2031.
Page 2 House Bill 848-First Edition